Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-539
Business of abstracting; requirements.

(1) An individual or business entity shall not engage in the business of abstracting in this state unless a certificate of authority has been issued to such individual or business entity.

(2) Every individual or business entity engaged in the business of abstracting shall be or have in its employ a registered abstracter. Only a registered abstracter may certify abstracts or otherwise attest to the accuracy of abstracts or prepare reports of title. An inactive abstracter shall not, for a fee or other valuable consideration, compile or certify abstracts of title or any part thereof to real property in any county within this state, prepare reports of title, or in any way engage in the business of abstracting.

Laws 1965, c. 453, § 10, p. 1440;

Laws 1969, c. 615, § 9, p. 2498;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 76-518;

Laws 1985, LB 47, § 9;

Laws 2002, LB 1071, § 3.

"Preparing written reports of title to real property" constitutes the "business of abstracting" for purposes of the Abstracters Act only when done in exchange for a fee or other valuable consideration. So construed, the Abstracters Act is not unconstitutionally overbroad on its face. State v. Rabourn, 269 Neb. 499, 693 N.W.2d 291 (2005).